Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 State-wide Probation System

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Where is the Strike Zone?
Arguing for a Uniformly Narrow Interpretation of the Prison Litigation Reform Act’s ‘Three Strikes’ Rule,” see 70 Emory L.J. 755 (2021).

42-8-20.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “State-wide Probation Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

Cross references.

Payments into the Georgia Crime Victims Emergency Fund, T. 17, C. 15.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, reenacted this Code section without change.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-21.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“DCS” means the Department of Community Supervision.

“Officer” means a community supervision officer as defined in Code Section 42-3-1.

“Qualified offense” means a felony offense of:

Burglary in the second degree in violation of Code Section 16-7-1;

Possession of tools for the commission of crime in violation of Code Section 16-7-20;

Criminal damage to property in the second degree in violation of Code Section 16-7-23;

Interference with government property in violation of Code Section 16-7-24;

Arson in the third degree in violation of Code Section 16-7-62;

Burning of woodlands, brush, fields, or other lands in violation of Code Section 16-7-63 when the punishment is as set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 16-7-63;

Theft in violation of Code Sections 16-8-2 through 16-8-9 when the punishment is as set forth in subparagraph (a)(1)(B) or (a)(1)(C) of Code Section 16-8-12;

Theft by shoplifting in violation of Code Section 16-8-14;

Refund fraud in violation of Code Section 16-8-14.1;

Conversion of payments for real property improvements in violation of Code Section 16-8-15;

Entering an automobile or other motor vehicle with intent to commit theft or felony in violation of Code Section 16-8-18;

Livestock theft in violation of Code Section 16-8-20;

Forgery in violation of Code Section 16-9-1;

Printing, executing, or negotiating checks, drafts, orders, or debit card sales drafts knowing information thereon to be in error, fictitious, or assigned to another account holder in violation of Code Section 16-9-21;

Financial transaction card offenses in violation of Code Section 16-9-31, 16-9-32, 16-9-33, 16-9-34, 16-9-35, 16-9-36.1, or 16-9-37, provided that the aggregate value of the loss does not exceed $25,000.00;

Failing to pay for natural products or chattels in violation of Code Section 16-9-58;

Purchasing, possessing, manufacturing, delivering, distributing, administering, selling, or possessing with the intent to distribute controlled substances, marijuana, counterfeit substances, or flunitrazepam in violation of Code Section 16-13-30;

Unlawfully manufacturing, delivering, distributing, selling, or possessing with the intent to distribute noncontrolled substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-30.1;

Possession of substances containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine or sales of products containing those ingredients in violation of Code Section 16-13-30.3 when the punishment is as set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 16-13-30.3; and

Violation of Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 16 when the punishment is as set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 16-13-79.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-5/SB 174.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions for “Reserved.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added paragraph (3).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

42-8-21

; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 repeal of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-8-22.
State-wide probation system for felony offenders created; administration generally.

There is created a state-wide probation system for felony offenders to be administered by DCS. Separate files and records shall be kept with relation to the system.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 2; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 16, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1643, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “There is created a state-wide probation system for felony offenders to be administered by the Department of Corrections. The probation system shall not be administered as part of the duties and activities of the State Board of Pardons and Paroles. Separate files and records shall be kept with relation to the system.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 13, provides that the policy-making functions of the probation system be vested in the Board of Offender Rehabilitation (now Board of Corrections) and that the administrative functions be vested in the Department of Offender Rehabilitation (now Department of Corrections).

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-23.
Administration of supervision of felony probationers by DCS; graduated sanctions.

As used in this Code section, the term “chief officer” means the highest ranking field officer in each judicial circuit who does not have direct supervision of the probationer who is the subject of the hearing.

DCS shall administer the supervision of felony probationers.

If graduated sanctions have been made a condition of probation by the court and if a probationer violates the conditions of his or her probation, other than for the commission of a new offense, DCS may impose graduated sanctions as an alternative to judicial modification or revocation of probation, provided that such graduated sanctions are approved by a chief officer.

The failure of a probationer to comply with the graduated sanction or sanctions imposed by DCS shall constitute a violation of probation.

A probationer may at any time voluntarily accept the graduated sanctions proposed by DCS.

DCS’s decision shall be final unless the probationer files an appeal in the sentencing court. Such appeal shall be filed within 30 days of the issuance of the decision by DCS.

Such appeal shall first be reviewed by the sentencing court upon the record. At the court’s discretion, a de novo hearing may be held on the decision. The filing of the appeal shall not stay DCS’s decision.

When the sentencing court does not act on the appeal within 30 days of the date of the filing of the appeal, DCS’s decision shall be affirmed by operation of law.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall alter the relationship between judges and officers prescribed in this article nor be construed as repealing any power given to any court of this state to place offenders on probation or to supervise offenders.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 1069, § 14; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1209, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1647, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1643, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 7-7/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The department shall administer the supervision of felony probationers. Nothing in this Code section shall alter the relationship between judges and probation supervisors prescribed in this article.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “DCS” for “The department” and “the department” throughout this Code section; substituted “DCS’s” for “The department’s” and “the department’s” throughout this Code section; deleted “probation” preceding “officer” in two places in subsection (a) and near the end of subsection (c); in paragraph (f)(2), substituted “sentencing court” for “judge” in the first sentence, substituted “court’s discretion” for “judge’s discretion” in the second sentence; substituted “court” for “judge” in paragraph (f)(3); and substituted “officers” for “probation supervisors” in subsection (g). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-24.
General duties of DCS; rules and regulations.

As used in this Code section, the term “split sentence” means any felony sentence that includes a term of imprisonment followed by a term of probation.

It shall be the duty of DCS to supervise and direct the work of the officers provided for in Code Section 42-8-25 and to keep accurate files and records on all probation cases, split sentence cases, parole cases, persons released pursuant to Code Section 17-10-1, and persons under supervision. It shall be the duty of the Board of Community Supervision to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 4; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 4; Ga. L. 1967, p. 86, § 3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 945, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added subsection (a); redesignated the previously existing provisions as subsection (b); and, in subsection (b), in the first sentence, substituted “DCS” for “the department” near the beginning, substituted “officers” for “probation supervisors” near the middle, inserted “, split sentence cases, parole cases, persons released pursuant to Code Section 17-10-1,”, and substituted “under supervision” for “on probation” at the end, and substituted “Board of Community Supervision” for “board” in the second sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-25.
Employment of community service officers; assignment to circuits by DCS.

DCS shall employ officers. DCS may assign one officer to each judicial circuit in this state or, for purposes of assignment, may consolidate two or more judicial circuits and assign one officer thereto. In the event DCS determines that more than one officer is needed for a particular circuit, additional officers may be assigned to the circuit. DCS is authorized to direct any officer to assist any other officer wherever assigned. In the event more than one officer is assigned to the same office or to the same division within a particular judicial circuit, DCS shall designate one of the officers to be in charge.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 5; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 5; Ga. L. 1965, p. 413, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The department shall employ probation supervisors. The department may assign one supervisor to each judicial circuit in this state or, for purposes of assignment, may consolidate two or more judicial circuits and assign one supervisor thereto. In the event the department determines that more than one supervisor is needed for a particular circuit, an additional supervisor or additional supervisors may be assigned to the circuit. The department is authorized to direct any probation supervisor to assist any other probation supervisor wherever assigned. In the event that more than one supervisor is assigned to the same office or to the same division within a particular judicial circuit, the department shall designate one of the supervisors to be in charge.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Duties of probation officers, §

15-11-67

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-26.
Qualifications of officer; compensation and expenses; conflicts of interest; bonds.

In order for a person to be an officer, he or she shall be at least 21 years of age at the time of appointment and shall have completed a standard two-year college course. The qualifications provided in this Code section are the minimum qualifications, and DCS is authorized to prescribe such additional and higher educational qualifications from time to time as it deems desirable, but not to exceed a four-year standard college course.

After January 1, 2016, in order for a person to be an officer, he or she shall complete the basic course of training for supervision of probations and parolees certified by the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council; provided, however, that such requirement shall be waived if such person is a certified peace officer.

The compensation of officers shall be set pursuant to the rules of the State Personnel Board. Officers shall also be allowed travel and other expenses as are other state employees.

No officer shall engage in any other employment, business, or activities which interfere or conflict with his or her duties and responsibilities as an officer.

No officer shall own, operate, have any financial interest in, be an instructor at, or be employed by any private entity which provides drug or alcohol education services or offers a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services.

No officer shall specify, directly or indirectly, a particular DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program which a probationer may or shall attend. This paragraph shall not prohibit such officer from furnishing any probationer, upon request, the names of certified DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Programs. Any officer violating this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Each officer shall give bond in such amount as may be fixed by DCS for the use of the person or persons damaged by his or her misfeasance or malfeasance and conditioned on the faithful performance of his or her duties. The cost of the bond shall be paid by DCS; provided, however, that the bond may be procured, either by DCS or by the Department of Administrative Services, under a master policy or on a group blanket coverage basis, where only the number of positions in each judicial circuit and the amount of coverage for each position are listed in a schedule attached to the bond; and in such case each individual shall be fully bonded and bound as principal, together with the surety, by virtue of his or her holding the position or performing the duties of officer in the circuit or circuits, and his or her individual signature shall not be necessary for such bond to be valid in accordance with all the laws of this state. The bond or bonds shall be made payable to DCS.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 6; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 6; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1092, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 413, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 86, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 42; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1107, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 24-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-63/HB 642; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “or she” twice in the first sentence of subsection (a); substituted “set pursuant to the rules of the State Personnel Board” for “set by the State Personnel Board and the State Personnel Administration” in the first sentence of subsection (b); and inserted “or her” throughout subsection (d).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, designated the previously existing provisions of subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(1); and, in paragraph (a)(1), substituted the present provisions for the former provisions, which read: “In order for a person to hold the office of probation supervisor, he or she must be at least 21 years of age at the time of appointment and must have completed a standard two-year college course, provided that any person who is employed as a probation supervisor on or before July 1, 1972, shall not be required to meet the educational requirements specified in this Code section, nor shall he or she be prejudiced in any way for not possessing the requirements. The qualifications provided in this Code section are the minimum qualifications and the department is authorized to prescribe such additional and higher educational qualifications from time to time as it deems desirable, but not to exceed a four-year standard college course.”; added paragraph (a)(2); in subsection (b), substituted “officers” for “the probation supervisors” in the first sentence, and substituted “Officers” for “Probation supervisors” at the beginning of the second sentence;
substituted “officer” for “supervisor” throughout subsection (c); substituted “an officer” for “probation supervisor” at the end of paragraph (c)(1); substituted “such officer” for “any supervisor” near the middle of second sentence of paragraph (c)(3); in subsection (d), substituted “DCS” for “the department” throughout, in the first sentence, substituted “officer” for “probation supervisor” near the beginning and near the end of the proviso, and substituted “DCS” for “the department payable to the department” in the middle of the first sentence. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-27.
Duties of officers.

An officer shall supervise and counsel probationers and parolees in the judicial circuit to which he or she is assigned. Each officer shall perform the duties prescribed in this chapter and other duties as are prescribed by DCS and shall make and keep any records and files and make such reports as are required of him or her by DCS, the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, or a court. Officers shall be authorized to provide supervision of defendants who are participants in a drug court division, mental health court division, or veterans court division operated by a superior court, provided that sufficient staff and resources exist for such supervision.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 7; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 7; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 6; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-6/SB 174.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “The probation supervisor shall supervise and counsel probationers in the judicial circuit to which he is assigned. Each supervisor shall perform the duties prescribed in this chapter and such duties as are prescribed by the department and shall keep such records and files and make such reports as are required of him.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added the last sentence.

Cross references.

Applicability of this state’s correction laws to probationers found in other states, T. 42, C. 11.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-8-28.
Assignment of officers among judicial circuits generally.

Officers shall be assigned among the respective judicial circuits based generally on the relative number of persons on probation and parole in each circuit.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 15A; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in this Code section, substituted “Officers” for “Probation supervisors” at the beginning, and inserted “and parole”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-29.
Presentence investigations; supervision of probationers; maintenance of records relating to probationers.

It shall be the duty of each officer to investigate all cases referred to him or her by the court and to make findings and report thereon in writing to the court with a recommendation. The superior court may require, before imposition of sentence, a presentence investigation and written report in each felony case in which the defendant has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or has been convicted.

An officer shall cause to be delivered to each person placed on probation under his or her supervision a copy of the terms of probation and any change or modification thereof and shall cause the person to be instructed regarding the same. An officer shall keep informed concerning the conduct, habits, associates, employment, recreation, and whereabouts of the probationer or parolee by visits, by requiring reports, or in other ways. An officer shall use all practicable and proper methods to aid and encourage persons on probation or parole and to bring about improvements in their conduct and condition.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 9; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 8; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, designated the previously existing provisions as subsections (a) and (b); inserted “or her” in the first sentence of subsections (a) and (b); in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “each officer” for “probation supervisor”, deleted “his” preceding “findings” in the middle, and substituted “a recommendation” for “his recommendation” near the end; in subsection (b), substituted “An officer” for “He” throughout, substituted “An officer” for “The probation supervisor” at the beginning of the first sentence and deleted “certified” preceding “copy”, inserted “or parolee” in the second sentence, deleted the former third sentence, which read: “He shall make such reports in writing or otherwise as the court may require.”, inserted “or parole” in the fourth sentence, and deleted the last sentence, which read: “He shall keep records on each probationer referred to him.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Applicability of this state’s correction laws to probationers’ found in other states, T. 42, C. 11.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, “the” was deleted following “It shall be the duty of” at the beginning of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article, “A Review of Georgia’s Probation Laws,” see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 255 (1970).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-29.1.
Disposition of officer’s records; confidentiality.

When a convicted person is committed to an institution under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, any presentence or post-sentence investigation or psychological evaluation compiled by an officer shall be forwarded to any division or office designated by the commissioner of corrections. Accompanying such document or evaluation shall be the case history form and the criminal history sheets from the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Georgia Crime Information Center, if available, unless any such information has previously been sent to the Department of Corrections pursuant to Code Section 42-5-50. A copy of such documents shall be made available for the State Board of Pardons and Paroles. A copy of one or more of such documents, based on need, may be forwarded to another institution to which the defendant may be committed.

The prison or institution receiving such documents shall maintain the confidentiality of the documents and the information contained therein and shall not send, release, or reveal them to any other person, institution, or agency without the express consent of the unit which originated or accumulated the documents.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-8-29.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 697, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 42; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 42; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), substituted “Department of Corrections” for “department” in the first and second sentences, in the first sentence, substituted “an officer” for “a probation supervisor or other probation official” in the middle and inserted “of corrections” at the end, substituted “such document or evaluation shall be” for “this document or evaluation will be” in the second sentence, substituted “such documents” for “these same documents” in the third sentence, substituted “such documents” for “these documents” in the last sentence and in the first sentence of subsection (b); in subsection (b), substituted “, release,” for “them or release them” in the middle and deleted “probation” preceding “unit” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-30.
Applicability of this article when private probation services are utilized.

In any county where the chief judge of the superior court, state court, municipal court, probate court, or magistrate court has provided for probation services for such court through agreement with a private corporation, enterprise, or agency or has established a county or municipal probation system for such court pursuant to Article 6 of this chapter, the provisions of this article relating to supervision services shall not apply to defendants sentenced in any such court.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 16; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 12; Code 1981, §

42-8-30

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-30.1 as present Code Section 42-8-30, and substituted “Article 6 of this chapter” for “Code Section 42-8-100” and deleted “probation” preceding “supervision” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Applicability of this state’s correction laws to probationers’ found in other states, T. 42, C. 11.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 42-8-30 (Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 16; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 12), relating to supervision of juvenile offenders by probation supervisors, was repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see
32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-30.1.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015, redesignated former Code Section 42-8-30.1 as present Code Section 42-8-30.

42-8-31.
Collection and disbursement of funds by officers; recordkeeping; bank accounts.

No officer shall collect or disburse any funds whatsoever, except by written order of the court; and it shall be the duty of the officer to transmit a copy of such order to DCS not later than 15 days after it has been issued by the court. Every officer who collects or disburses any funds whatsoever shall faithfully keep the records of accounts as are required by DCS, which records shall be subject to inspection by DCS at any time. In every instance when a bank account is required, it shall be kept in the name of the Department of Community Supervision.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1092, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 15; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “No probation supervisor shall collect or disburse any funds whatsoever, except by written order of the court; and it shall be the duty of the supervisor to transmit a copy of the order to the department not later than 15 days after it has been issued by the court. Every supervisor who collects or disburses any funds whatsoever shall faithfully keep the records of accounts as are required by the department, which records shall be subject to inspection by the department at any time. In every instance where a bank account is required, it shall be kept in the name of the ‘State Probation Office.’ ” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Applicability of this state’s correction laws to probationers’ found in other states, T. 42, C. 11.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-32.
Funds which may be collected by officers.

No officer shall be directed to collect any funds other than funds directed to be paid as the result of a criminal proceeding.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 27, § 14; Ga. L. 1958, p. 15, § 10; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1148, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 10; Ga. L. 1989, p. 380, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “officer” for “probation supervisor” in this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Applicability of this state’s correction laws to probationers’ found in other states, T. 42, C. 11.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 amendment to this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 232 (1989).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-8-33.
Audits of accounts of officers; records and reports of audits; bonds of auditors; refunding overpayment of fines, restitutions, or moneys owed.

DCS shall make periodic audits of each officer who, by virtue of the officer’s duties, has any moneys, fines, court costs, property, or other funds coming into the officer’s control or possession or being disbursed by such officer. DCS shall keep a permanent record of the audit of each officer’s accounts on file. It shall be the duty of the employee of DCS conducting the audit to notify DCS in writing of any discrepancy of an illegal nature that might result in prosecution. DCS shall have the right to interview and make inquiry of certain selected payors or recipients of funds, as it may choose, without notifying the officer, to carry out the purposes of the audit. The employee who conducts the audit shall be required to give bond in such amount as may be set by DCS, in the same manner and for the same purposes as provided under Code Section 42-8-26 for the bonds of officers. The bond shall bind the employee and the employee’s surety in the performance of the employee’s duties.

Any overpayment of fines, restitutions, or other moneys owed as a condition of probation shall not be refunded to the probationer if the amount of the overpayment is less than $5.00.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1092, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 413, § 5; Ga. L. 1967, p. 86, § 5; Ga. L. 1972, p. 604, § 13; Ga. L. 1987, p. 452, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 4-1/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “DCS” for “The department” and “the department” throughout subsection (a); in subsection (a), substituted “officer” for “probation supervisor” in the first and fourth sentences, in the first sentence, substituted “the officer’s” for “his” twice, and substituted “disbursed by such officer” for “him. The department” at the end, in the second sentence, added “DCS” at the beginning and substituted “officer’s” for “probation supervisor’s”, substituted “officers” for “probation supervisors” at the end of the next-to-last sentence, and substituted “the employee’s” for “his” twice in the last sentence; and substituted “the overpayment” for “such overpayment” in subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “overpayment” was twice substituted for “over-payment” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).